Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.640.050

Enforcement—Superintendent's orders, scope.

The superintendent of public instruction shall have the power to enforce and obtain compliance with the provisions of this chapter and the regulations and guidelines adopted pursuant thereto by appropriate order made pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW, which order, by way of illustration, may include, the termination of all or part of state apportionment or categorical moneys to the offending school district, the termination of specified programs in which violations may be flagrant within the offending school district, the institution of a mandatory affirmative action program within the offending school district, and the placement of the offending school district on probation with appropriate sanctions until compliance is achieved.

[ 1975 1st ex.s. c 226 s 5. Formerly RCW 28A.85.050.]

NOTES:

Severability—1975 1st ex.s. c 226: See note following RCW 28A.640.010.